Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CERTIFIED NURSE ASSISTANT TRAINING.new text end new text begin $42,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Aspirus Lake View Hospital, a nonprofit, to provide workforce training to create up to 12 new certified nursing assistants for local employers. Grant money may be used for training and curriculum costs, certification testing, and a retention bonus for trainees. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. new text end